Maine, session 132, LD1371.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 3 MRSA §2-B, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2019, c. 384, §1, is further
amended to read:
2. Duties of commission; biennial report. No later than January 15th of every even-
numbered year the commission shall submit to the Legislature and the joint standing
committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over state and local government matters a
final report of the commission. In the last year of each gubernatorial term of office, the
report must contain a recommendation for compensation of the Governor as established in
Title 2, section 1. A report under this subsection must contain:
A. A description of the commission's activities;
B. The recommendations of the commission:
(1-A) For the report required in the last year of a gubernatorial term, for
compensation for the Governor, including all payments for salaries, meals,
housing, travel, mileage, constituent services and all other expenses and
allowances; and
(1-B) For compensation for justices and judges, including all payments for
salaries, meals, housing, travel, mileage and all other expenses and allowances, and
for additional services by any justice or judge. Nothing in this subparagraph
prevents the judicial branch from making recommendations to the Governor or
Legislature for compensation for justices and judges, including, but not limited to,
recommendations made by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court in
preparing the budget of the judicial branch as required by Title 4, section 1; and
(1-C) For compensation of Legislators, representatives of Indian tribes, Secretary
and Assistant Secretary of the Senate and Clerk and Assistant Clerk of the House
of Representatives, including all payments for salaries, meals, housing, travel,
mileage, constituent services and all other expenses and allowances, and for
additional services by the President of the Senate, Speaker of the House of
Representatives and members of legislative leadership;
C. The reasons for its recommendations;
D. Drafts of any legislation required to implement its recommendations; and
E. Any other material and recommendations that commission members may wish to
submit.
Before reporting as required in this subsection and subsequent to giving public notice, the
commission shall hold a public hearing on the report. Subsequent to reporting, the
commission shall meet, if requested, with the Governor, the Legislative Council and
legislative committees to discuss the report.
The joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over state and local
government matters may introduce a bill based upon the final report of the commission.
Sec. 2. 3 MRSA §2-B, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Review of judicial compensation; annual report. In consultation with the
Commissioner of Administrative and Financial Services, the commission shall calculate
Page 1 - 132LR1884(01)

412 the average salary on June 30th of each year across the other New England states for the
423 chief justices of each state’s court of final appeal; the associate justices of each state’s court
434 of final appeal; and the judges of each state’s statewide trial court of general jurisdiction.
445 For the purposes of this section, "the other New England states" include the states of
456 Connecticut, Massachusetts, New Hampshire, Rhode Island and Vermont. No later than
467 December 1st of each year, the commission shall submit a report to the Chief Justice of the
478 Supreme Judicial Court and to the joint standing committees of the Legislature having
489 jurisdiction over judiciary matters and appropriations and financial affairs detailing the
590 average salaries calculated as required by this subsection. The joint standing committee of
1501 the Legislature having jurisdiction over appropriations and financial affairs shall, if
1512 necessary, report out a bill based upon the report proposing that, effective at the beginning
1523 of the fiscal year following the date of the report:
A. The salary of the Chief Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court is greater than or equal
to 80% of the average salary set forth in the report for the chief justices of each state's
court of final appeal in the other New England states;
B. The salaries of the Associate Justices of the Supreme Judicial Court are greater than
or equal to 80% of the average salary set forth in the report for the associate justices of
each state’s court of final appeal in the other New England states; and
C. The salaries of the Justices of the Superior Court and the Judges of the District Court
are greater than or equal to 80% of the average salary set forth in the report for the
judges on each state's statewide trial court of general jurisdiction in the other New
England states.
Nothing in this subsection prevents the judicial branch from making recommendations to
the Governor or Legislature for compensation for justices and judges, including, but not
limited to, recommendations made by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court in
preparing the budget of the judicial branch as required by Title 4, section 1. In making
such recommendations, the Chief Justice shall indicate whether any recommended salary
adjustments for justices or judges are less than, the same as or greater than the salaries
calculated in accordance with paragraphs A to C.